Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-221
Control of advertising outside of right-of-way; compliance; damages; violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, company, or corporation violating any of the provisions of sections 39-212 to 39-222 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. In addition to any other available remedies, the Director-State Engineer, for the Department of Transportation and in the name of the State of Nebraska, may apply to the district court having jurisdiction for an injunction to force compliance with any of the provisions of such sections or rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. When any person, firm, company, or corporation deems its property rights have been adversely affected by the application of the provisions of such sections, such person, firm, company, or corporation shall have the right to have damages ascertained and determined pursuant to Chapter 76, article 7.

Laws 1972, LB 1181, § 11;

Laws 1974, LB 490, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 211;

Laws 1994, LB 848, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1993, § 39-1320.10;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 102.

An injunction may properly be entered to require compliance with the statute making it unlawful to erect or maintain advertising signs along highways prior to determination of whether there is a right to damages resulting from application of the statute. State v. Mayhew Products Corp., 204 Neb. 266, 281 N.W.2d 783 (1979).

Sections 39-1320 to 39-1320.11 constitute a reasonable and valid exercise of the police power which bears a substantial relation to the public health, safety, and general welfare, and are constitutional. State v. Mayhew Products Corp., 204 Neb. 266, 281 N.W.2d 783 (1979).